Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-726
Proceedings prior to formal hearing; confidential.

All papers filed with and proceedings before the Commission on Judicial Qualifications or masters appointed by the Supreme Court pursuant to section 24-721 prior to any formal open hearing shall be confidential. The filing of papers with and the testimony given before the commission or masters or the Supreme Court shall be deemed a privileged communication.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 12, p. 434;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 11.